Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-6,109
Sections; supplemental to other laws.

The powers granted by sections 16-6,106 to 16-6,109 are independent of and in addition to all other grants of powers on the same or related subjects but may be exercised jointly with or supplemented by the powers granted by existing state law, including, but not limited to, sections 16-667 to 16-672.11, 16-680, 16-683, 16-693, 18-401 to 18-411, 18-501 to 18-512, 19-1305, 23-320.07 to 23-320.13, and 31-501 to 31-553 and the Combined Improvement Act.

Laws 1971, LB 57, § 4;

Laws 2003, LB 52, § 1;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 171;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 326.
April 19, 2022
Combined Improvement Act, see section 19-2415.